Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.416

Decision not to conduct an adjudication.

If an agency decides not to conduct an adjudicative proceeding in response to an application, the agency shall furnish the applicant a copy of its decision in writing, with a brief statement of the agency's reasons and of any administrative review available to the applicant.

[ 1988 c 288 s 403.]